Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 16 Small Claims and Consumer Claims

10-16-1.
Actions subject to chapter.

In all ex contractu civil actions and in any action to recover the amount of any tax for money only not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) exclusive of interest and costs, and in all actions or suits to recover damages resulting from a retail sale of tangible personal property to a member of the general public or from services rendered to a member of the general public in which the plaintiff seeks to recover an amount of money only not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) exclusive of interest and costs, and in all actions or suits based upon a negotiable instrument involving an amount of money only not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) exclusive of interest and costs, the procedure shall, at the plaintiff’s election, shown by his or her waiver of appeal, be as provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2022, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-1

; P.L. 1959, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 12; P.L. 1970, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 232, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 192, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 144, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

10-16-2.
Jurisdiction of district court.

The district court shall have full jurisdiction of actions brought under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 12.

10-16-3.
Venue of actions — Rules of practice.

The venue of actions under this chapter shall be the same as in ordinary civil actions, except cases wherein the plaintiff is a corporation, in which event the action must be brought in the division of the district court wherein the defendant resides. If the defendant resides outside the state, then the venue shall be the same as in other civil actions. The laws relating to practice in ordinary civil actions in the district court, which are applicable to this procedure, and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, shall apply to cases under this procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 12; P.L. 1976, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 2.

10-16-3.1.
Corporations — Representatives.

Any corporation with total assets of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) organized under the laws of this state or licensed to do business under the laws of this state, which is a corporation incorporated as a close corporation pursuant to §

7-1.2-1701

, or if the corporation is a close corporation or which is a corporation whose majority stockholders are family members related by blood or marriage, may designate a representative thereof to prosecute claims under this chapter; provided, however, that no representative may be designated to prosecute claims for more than one corporation. The designation authorized by an officer of the corporation shall be filed with the clerk of the district court in which any claim is filed.

No representative under this section, if not licensed to practice law, shall be deemed to be practicing law without a license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 10; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 10.

10-16-4.
Filing fee — Waiver of appeal.

The plaintiff shall pay into the court an entry fee of fifty-five dollars ($55.00), of which twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be placed in a “small claims mediation restricted-receipt account” together with an amount equal to the then-prevailing postal rate, for mailing notices in the case, which shall be deemed the beginning of the action. The “small claims mediation restricted-receipt account” shall be established under the control of the state court director of finance; the chief judge of the district court shall be authorized to pay for the services of qualified mediators and other related expenses from the “small claims mediation restricted-receipt account.” In addition to the entry fee, the court shall apply a technology surcharge in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

The plaintiff shall also file with his or her claim a written waiver of right of appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 2; P.L. 1932, ch. 1904, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 3024, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-4

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 12; P.L. 1976, ch. 192, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 300, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 9, § 13; P.L. 2009, ch. 372, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 381, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 6; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 6.

10-16-5.
Rules of procedure.

The judges of the district court shall make such orders and rules as they deem necessary concerning the hearing and determination of small claims, including suitable forms of procedure in such cases.

The chief judge of the district court shall be authorized to establish a system of mandatory mediation for all small claims actions other than actions relating to book accounts for a sum certain. The judges of the district court shall be authorized to make such rules as may be necessary for the establishment of said mandatory mediation system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 300, § 2.

10-16-6.
Notations in docket — Refusal or return undelivered of notice to defendant.

The clerk shall note in the docket or in the papers of the case the mailing date of the notice and the address of the defendant. Notice shall be valid although refused by the defendant, and therefore not delivered. If the notice is returned undelivered without refusal by the defendant, or if in any other way it appears that notice has not reached the defendant, the clerk shall issue at the expense of the plaintiff such further or other notice to appear for hearing at such time as the court may order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-6

.

10-16-7.
Judgment on default by defendant.

At the time set for answering, if the defendant does not appear to answer and defend the claim, he or she may then, or thereafter as the court may order, be defaulted, and judgment entered against him or her in favor of the plaintiff for his or her claim, or so much thereof as the court may find to be justly due and owing, or that should be awarded to the plaintiff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-7

; P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 2.

10-16-8.
Default by plaintiff — Prevention of abuse of procedure by claimants.

If the plaintiff does not appear at the time set for the hearing, the court may dismiss the claim and action for want of prosecution, or enter judgment for the defendant for his or her costs, or make such other disposition of the case as may be proper.

If the clerk shall find that the procedure provided by this chapter is sought to be utilized by a claimant for purposes of oppression or harassment, as where the claimant has previously resorted to such procedure on the same claim and has been unsuccessful after hearing thereon, the clerk may in his or her discretion compel the claimant to make application to the court for leave to prosecute the claim under this chapter. The court upon such application shall inquire into the circumstances and, if it shall find that the claim has already been adjudicated, or that the claim is sought to be brought on solely for purposes of oppression or harassment and not under color of right, it may make an order denying the claimant the availability of the procedure provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-8

; P.L. 1970, ch. 214, § 1.

10-16-9.
Filing of defense — Counterclaim.

Prior to or upon the date set for answering the defendant shall in writing file in court his or her answer or defense to the plaintiff’s claim and may claim any counterclaim he or she may have against the plaintiff’s claim, as he or she might plead the claim in an action begun by complaint and summons, and shall file a statement in writing of his or her counterclaim with the court, and the court shall determine which of the parties is entitled to decision against the other, and in what amount, and enter decision accordingly, but not exceeding the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). If the defendant’s counterclaim shall exceed the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and in the opinion of the court there shall be due the defendant thereon an amount greater than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the court shall enter decision against the plaintiff as in case of nonsuit, and for the defendant for his or her costs only, and shall not further adjudicate upon the claim of the defendant, whose right to sue for the claim shall remain in the same manner as before the commencement of the action. The court may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-9

; P.L. 1959, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 57; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 12; P.L. 1976, ch. 192, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 432, § 1.

10-16-10.
Amendment of statements — Informality of proceedings — Evidence.

The court may at any time after such notice and upon such terms as it shall determine allow any claim or answer to be amended. No formal pleadings other than the statement of their respective claims in writing shall be necessary to define the issue between the parties, and the hearing of all such causes shall be informal with the sole object of dispensing speedy and final justice between the parties. The witnesses in the hearings shall be sworn and depositions may be used at the hearing, provided the depositions have been taken according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-10

.

10-16-11.
Vacation of decisions or orders — Order of new hearing.

The court may at any time upon motion, and after such notice, by mail or otherwise as it may order for cause shown, vacate any decision, order or judgment entered by it under this procedure for want of actual notice to a party, for error, or for any other cause that the court may deem sufficient, and may stay or vacate execution, and may order a new hearing, upon such terms, costs, and conditions as the court shall deem just and proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-11

.

10-16-12.
Manner of payment of judgment — Stay of execution.

The court may order that the judgment shall be paid to the prevailing party at such time, or by such instalments, as it shall deem proper, and may stay the issue of execution and other supplementary process during compliance with the court’s order. The stay shall at all times be subject to being modified or vacated by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-12

.

10-16-13.
Disbursements allowed as costs.

The actual cash disbursements of the prevailing party for entry fee, mailing fee, and officers’ and witness fees shall be allowed as costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-13

.

10-16-14.
Appeals by defendant.

The defendant, if aggrieved by the decision of the district court in a cause brought under the provisions of this chapter, shall have the same right of appeal, and under the same terms and conditions, as are provided under the practice in ordinary civil actions in district courts.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, in cases in which the plaintiff is the purchaser of a consumer product seeking to recover damages against the seller and/or manufacturer of that product, if the defendant is defaulted for failure to answer and defend the claim, the judgment of the district court shall be final. In such event, the defendant shall be deemed to have forfeited all rights to appeal and shall not be entitled to a trial de novo in superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-14

; P.L. 1984, ch. 235, § 1.

10-16-15.
Remedies for enforcement of judgments.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a party obtaining judgment under this chapter shall be entitled to the same remedies, processes, costs and benefits as are given or enure to other judgment creditors including the right to use trustee process in the same small claims action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-15

; P.L. 1987, ch. 77, § 2.

10-16-16.
Appropriations for carrying out chapter.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for the purpose of meeting the expenses of the district court in carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the necessary sums, or so much thereof as may be from time to time required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the chief clerk of the district court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1596, § 15; P.L. 1932, ch. 1904, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 592, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

10-16-16

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 12.